Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB591.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.814 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In order to ensure that high-quality, relevant secondary career and technical
programs are available to students in all school districts that enable them to gain the
academic and technical skills to meet high school graduation requirements and for
successful transition to postsecondary education, work, or the military and to
support present-day and future needs of Kentucky employers, the Department of
Education shall:
(a) Review and revise as needed the equipment and facilities standards for each
career and technical education program identified and described in the career
and technical education supplement to the Kentucky program of studies and
published by the Department of Education; and
(b) Determine the statewide unmet needs for career and technical education
capital projects, including renovations and expansions of existing facilities
and the construction of new technology centers, through a needs assessment
process. This process shall be tied to specific criteria in determining if the
current programs or career pathways offered in locally and state-operated
facilities are appropriate for the students in the school districts served as well
as for determining if new programs are needed. The statewide assessment of
capital needs for career and technical education shall be incorporated into the
local school district facility plan as required by KRS 157.420. The Kentucky
Board of Education shall incorporate criteria within the administrative
regulations relating to school facility plan requirements to prioritize need for
career and technical education programming, regardless of whether the
programs are locally or state-operated.
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education shall develop a career pathway or a
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/5/2026 1:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1672
program within a career pathway focused on education in performing arts to be
offered in locally and state-operated career and technical education programs.
(3) The Career and Technical Education Advisory Committee established in KRS
156.806 shall be consulted in carrying out the requirements of this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/5/2026 1:21 PM Jacketed